language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0440 Y 68
SFX 0440 a aca .
SFX 0440 a acaj .
SFX 0440 a ace .
SFX 0440 a aceho .
SFX 0440 a acej .
SFX 0440 a aceje .
SFX 0440 a aceju .
SFX 0440 a acemu .
SFX 0440 a ach .
SFX 0440 a achmoj .
SFX 0440 a achmy .
SFX 0440 a achu .
SFX 0440 a acoh .
SFX 0440 a acom .
SFX 0440 a acu .
SFX 0440 a acy .
SFX 0440 a acych .
SFX 0440 a acym .
SFX 0440 a acymaj .
SFX 0440 a acymi .
SFX 0440 a ana .
SFX 0440 a anaj .
SFX 0440 a ane .
SFX 0440 a aneho .
SFX 0440 a anej .
SFX 0440 a aneje .
SFX 0440 a aneju .
SFX 0440 a anemu .
SFX 0440 a ani .
SFX 0440 a anoh .
SFX 0440 a anom .
SFX 0440 a anu .
SFX 0440 a any .
SFX 0440 a anych .
SFX 0440 a anym .
SFX 0440 a anymaj .
SFX 0440 a anymi .
SFX 0440 a ał .
SFX 0440 a ała .
SFX 0440 a ałe .
SFX 0440 a ało .
SFX 0440 a ałoj .
SFX 0440 a eli .
SFX 0440 a eni .
SFX 0440 a enja .
SFX 0440 a enjach .
SFX 0440 a enjam .
SFX 0440 a enje .
SFX 0440 a enjemi .
SFX 0440 a enjom .
SFX 0440 a enjomaj .
SFX 0440 a enjow .
SFX 0440 a enju .
SFX 0440 a eć .
SFX 0440 a eše .
SFX 0440 a eštaj .
SFX 0440 a eštej .
SFX 0440 a ešće .
SFX 0440 a i .
SFX 0440 a icy .
SFX 0440 a imoj .
SFX 0440 a imy .
SFX 0440 a itaj .
SFX 0440 a itej .
SFX 0440 a iće .
SFX 0440 a iš .
SFX 0440 a o .
SFX 0440 a u .

SFX 0441 Y 71
SFX 0441 ac akli ..
SFX 0441 ac aku ..
SFX 0441 ac akł ..
SFX 0441 ac akła ..
SFX 0441 ac akłe ..
SFX 0441 ac akło ..
SFX 0441 ac akłoj ..
SFX 0441 ac eč ..
SFX 0441 ac ečaca ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečace ..
SFX 0441 ac ečaceho ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacej ..
SFX 0441 ac ečaceje ..
SFX 0441 ac ečaceju ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacemu ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacoh ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacom ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacu ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacy ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacych ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacym ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacymaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečacymi ..
SFX 0441 ac eče ..
SFX 0441 ac ečech ..
SFX 0441 ac ečechmoj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečechmy ..
SFX 0441 ac ečechu ..
SFX 0441 ac ečemoj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečemy ..
SFX 0441 ac ečena ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečene ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeneho ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenej ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeneje ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeneju ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenemu ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeni ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenja ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenjach ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenjam ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenje ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenjemi ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenjom ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenjomaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenjow ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenju ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenoh ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenom ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenu ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeny ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenych ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenym ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenymaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečenymi ..
SFX 0441 ac ečetaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečetej ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeće ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeš ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeše ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeštaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečeštej ..
SFX 0441 ac ečešće ..
SFX 0441 ac ečmoj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečmy ..
SFX 0441 ac ečo ..
SFX 0441 ac ečtaj ..
SFX 0441 ac ečtej ..
SFX 0441 ac ečće ..

SFX 0442 Y 71
SFX 0442 ehń ahnu ...
SFX 0442 ehń ahnyli ...
SFX 0442 ehń ahnyć ...
SFX 0442 ehń ahnył ...
SFX 0442 ehń ahnyła ...
SFX 0442 ehń ahnyłe ...
SFX 0442 ehń ahnyło ...
SFX 0442 ehń ahnyłoj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjaca ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjace ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjaceho ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacej ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjaceje ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjaceju ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacemu ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacoh ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacom ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacu ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacy ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacych ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacym ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacymaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjacymi ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnje ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjech ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjechmoj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjechmy ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjechu ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjemoj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjemy ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjena ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjene ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjeneho ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenej ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjeneje ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjeneju ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenemu ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjeni ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenja ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenjach ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenjam ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenje ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenjemi ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenjom ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenjomaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenjow ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenju ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenoh ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenom ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenu ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjeny ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenych ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenym ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenymaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjenymi ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjetaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjetej ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjeće ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnješ ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnješe ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnještaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnještej ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnješće ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehnjo ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehńmoj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehńmy ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehńtaj ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehńtej ...
SFX 0442 ehń ehńće ...

SFX 0443 Y 18
SFX 0443 ata ataj ...
SFX 0443 ata ate ...
SFX 0443 ata ateho ...
SFX 0443 ata atej ...
SFX 0443 ata ateje ...
SFX 0443 ata ateju ...
SFX 0443 ata atemu ...
SFX 0443 ata ato ...
SFX 0443 ata atoh ...
SFX 0443 ata atom ...
SFX 0443 ata atu ...
SFX 0443 ata aty ...
SFX 0443 ata atych ...
SFX 0443 ata atym ...
SFX 0443 ata atymaj ...
SFX 0443 ata atymi ...
SFX 0443 ata aći ...
SFX 0443 ata eći ...

SFX 0444 Y 83
SFX 0444 leć leća ...
SFX 0444 leć lećaca ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećace ...
SFX 0444 leć lećaceho ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacej ...
SFX 0444 leć lećaceje ...
SFX 0444 leć lećaceju ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacemu ...
SFX 0444 leć lećach ...
SFX 0444 leć lećachmoj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećachmy ...
SFX 0444 leć lećachu ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacoh ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacom ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacu ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacy ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacych ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacym ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacymaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećacymi ...
SFX 0444 leć lećana ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećane ...
SFX 0444 leć lećaneho ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanej ...
SFX 0444 leć lećaneje ...
SFX 0444 leć lećaneju ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanemu ...
SFX 0444 leć lećani ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanoh ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanom ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanu ...
SFX 0444 leć lećany ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanych ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanym ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanymaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećanymi ...
SFX 0444 leć lećał ...
SFX 0444 leć lećała ...
SFX 0444 leć lećałe ...
SFX 0444 leć lećało ...
SFX 0444 leć lećałoj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećeli ...
SFX 0444 leć lećeni ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenja ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenjach ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenjam ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenje ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenjemi ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenjom ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenjomaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenjow ...
SFX 0444 leć lećenju ...
SFX 0444 leć lećeć ...
SFX 0444 leć lećeše ...
SFX 0444 leć lećeštaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećeštej ...
SFX 0444 leć lećešće ...
SFX 0444 leć leći ...
SFX 0444 leć lećicy ...
SFX 0444 leć lećimoj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećimy ...
SFX 0444 leć lećitaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećitej ...
SFX 0444 leć lećiće ...
SFX 0444 leć lećiš ...
SFX 0444 leć lećmoj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećmy ...
SFX 0444 leć lećo ...
SFX 0444 leć lećtaj ...
SFX 0444 leć lećtej ...
SFX 0444 leć leću ...
SFX 0444 leć lećće ...
SFX 0444 leć poleća ...
SFX 0444 leć poleći ...
SFX 0444 leć polećimoj ...
SFX 0444 leć polećimy ...
SFX 0444 leć polećitaj ...
SFX 0444 leć polećitej ...
SFX 0444 leć polećiće ...
SFX 0444 leć polećiš ...
SFX 0444 leć poleću ...
