language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
lac/0441
lata/0443
lehń/0442
nalata/0443
njelac/0441
njelehń/0442
njeleć/0444
njeprjódkćehń/0442
njerža/0440
njełža/0440
nješča/0440
polata/0443
prjódkćehń/0442
rozlata/0443
rža/0440
wulata/0443
zlata/0443
łža/0440
šnalata/0443
šča/0440
